New Jersey, session 222, S1590.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Community Affairs shall establish an internet database of government records displaying State and local department, agency, commission, authority, and instrumentality records.  The database shall be accessible by the public.  The Commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding which government records shall be submitted to the department for inclusion in the database.  The Commissioner shall designate which government records shall be accessible in the database in the medium or format the agency maintains and which government records shall be converted to a more user-friendly format for the database.  When determining the format of a record to be included in the database, the commissioner shall consider both ease of format accessibility for the public and the cost and effort of conversion to the agency. As used in this section, government record shall have the same meaning as in section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1). 2.    There is hereby appropriated $10,000,000 from the State General Fund to the Department of Community Affairs for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this act, but the Commissioner may take such anticipatory action as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 180th day after the date of enactment.